Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Chapter 4 Labor and Materials on Ditches, Canals and Reservoirs

Cross references. —

As to lien upon reservoirs, irrigation systems and ditches, see §

36-7-326

.

As to authority of board of directors of water conservancy districts to discharge and create liens in connection with use and distribution of water, see §

41-3-749

.

As to lien for work done, etc., in connection with jointly owned ditches, see §

41-5-103

.

As to liens for labor and materials in connection with irrigation works generally, see §§

41-5-201

to

41-5-203

.

As to liens on annual assessment on the use of water, see §

41-7-408

.

§ 29-4-101.
Persons entitled to lien; extent thereof.

Any person who performs any work or furnishes any materials for the construction or improvement of any ditch, canal or reservoir under contract with the owner or his contractor or subcontractor, on complying with W.S.

29-2-101

through

29-2-109

, is entitled to a lien for work done or material furnished upon the ditch, canal or reservoir. The lien covers:

The right-of-way for the ditch, canal or reservoir;

The pertinent water permits and water rights; and

The reclaimed lands for which the ditch, canal or reservoir was constructed.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 54, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4860; R.S. 1931, § 66-502; C.S. 1945, § 55-225; W.S. 1957, § 29-73; W.S. 1977, §

29-4-101

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Company that constructed ditch and obtained water rights

in connection with development of land, under Carey Act, has an interest in such ditch, water rights and other appurtenances to which a lien may attach for work and material furnished in constructing the ditch. Lakeview Canal Co. v. R. Hardesty Mfg. Co., 31 Wyo. 182, 224 P. 853,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1924).

§ 29-4-102.
Filing of lien statement; enforcement.

Any person entitled may file a lien statement as provided by W.S.

29-1-103

through

29-1-314

and

29-2-101

through

29-2-113

and may enforce his lien in the same manner.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 54, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 4861; R.S. 1931, § 66-503; C.S. 1945, § 55-226; W.S. 1957, § 29-74; W.S. 1977, §

29-4-102

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2010, ch. 92, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “W.S.

29-1-103

through

29-1-314

” for “W.S.

29-1-101

through

29-1-308

” and “through

29-2-113

” for “through

29-2-109

.”